Hawaii, session 2026, GM1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 201H-201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read as follows:
""Mixed-income rental project” means a rental housing
development that provides units for households at a range of
income levels, primarily for households with an income at or
below one hundred forty per cent of the area median income."
SECTION 2. Section 201H-202, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§201H-202 Rental housing revolving fund. (a) There is
established the rental housing revolving fund to be administered
by the corporation.
(b) An amount from the fund, to be set by the corporation
and authorized by the legislature, may be used for
administrative expenses incurred by the corporation in
administering the corporation's housing finance programs;
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx 1
MniilllillliilMIIIHIWIIM

Page 2
S.B. NO. S
C.D. 1
provided that fund moneys shall not be used to finance day-to-
day administrative expenses of projects allotted fund moneys.
(c) The following may be deposited into the fund[-i-] or
into the mixed-income subaccount established under subsection
(f) :
(1) Appropriations made by the legislature;
(2) Conveyance taxes pursuant to section 247-7;
(3) Private contributions;
(4) Repayment of loans;
(5) Interest;
(6) Other returns; and
(7) Moneys from other sources.
{d) [&xccpt-] Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, and
except as provided in subsection (f), the fund shall be used to
provide [ieafte] any and all forms of financing, including but
not limited to loans, equity investments, credit enhancement,
and collateral for the development, pre-development,
construction, acquisition, preservation, and substantial
rehabilitation of rental housing units. The corporation shall
not forgive any loan made from the fund unless the corporation
forecloses on the project. Permitted uses of the fund may
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx
HMimillillMliniiMIB

Page 3 S.B. NO. ““2
C.D. 1
include but are not limited to planning, design, land
acquisition, costs of options, agreements of sale, downpayments,
equity financing, capacity building of nonprofit housing
developers, credit enhancement, gap financing, or other housing
development services or activities as provided in rules adopted
by the corporation pursuant to chapter 91. The rules may
provide for a means of recapturing loans or grants made from the
fund if a rental housing project financed under the fund is
refinanced or sold at a later date. The rules may also provide
that moneys from the fund shall be leveraged with other
financial resources to the extent possible.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f), moneys available
in the fund shall be used for the purpose of providing, in whole
or in part, loans for rental housing projects demonstrating
project readiness, efficiency, and feasibility acceptable to the
corporation in the following order of priority:
(1) Projects or units in projects that are allocated
low-income housing credits pursuant to the state
housing credit ceiling under section 42(h) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or projects
or units in projects that are funded by programs of
M202H6-H25I6I4I IISHB2M060H iCnDliH SiMnAi.ldllolclMx

Page 4 S.B. NO. 2060
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development and United States Department of
Agriculture Rural Development wherein:
(A) At least fifty per cent of the available units
are for persons and families with incomes at or
below eighty per cent of the median family income
of which at least five per cent of the available
units are for persons and families with incomes
at or below thirty per cent of the median family
income; and
(B) The remaining units are for persons and families
with incomes at or below one hundred per cent of
the median family income;
provided that the corporation may establish rules to
ensure full occupancy of fund projects; provided
further that for projects that were awarded low-income
housing credits pursuant to this paragraph priority
shall be given to projects with a perpetual
affordability commitment. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "perpetual" means the useful life of the
project; and
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx 4
iniMffliiDgiiiDmiiiiH

Page 5
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
(2) Mixed-income rental projects or units in a
mixed-income rental project primarily for persons and
families with incomes at or below one hundred forty
per cent of the median family income[—], as provided
by this section.
(f) There is established within the fund a mixed-income
subaccount. Moneys in the mixed-income subaccount shall be used
for any and all forms of financing, including but not limited to
loans, equity investments, [and] credit enhancement, and
collateral, for mixed-income rentals for qualified residents as
defined in section 201H-32. The corporation shall establish an
application process for the allocation of funds in the
mixed-income subaccount, separate from the fund allocation
process pursuant to section 201H-204(c), that gives preference
to projects meeting the following criteria:
(1) A diverse range of affordability, prioritizing persons
and families with incomes up to one hundred forty per
cent of the median family income;
(2) Projects located on [state- or county owned] state- or
county-owned land or developed in partnership with the
State or a county;
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx
IMMIIHIinWIINIHIilH

Pages
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Projects that efficiently use state funding;
(4) Mixed-income rental projects or units in a
mixed-income rental project in an area that satisfy
transit-supportive density requirements, as defined in
section 206E-246; [eftd]
(5) Rental housing projects that price units at the
minimum level to be revenue neutral, as determined by
rules adopted by the corporation pursuant to
chapter 91;
(6) Projects with a perpetual affordability commitment;
(7) Projects proposed by applicants with a demonstrated
history of early repayment to the fund; and
(4&4-1 (8) Any other criteria as the corporation deems
necessary to carry out the purposes of this
subsection.
If the corporation, after applying the process described in
this subsection, finds a nonprofit or government project equally
ranked with a for-profit project, the corporation shall give
preference to the nonprofit or government project in allotting
funds from the mixed-income subaccount.
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx 6
IIIIIIHIIIMIHIIIIilHill

S.B. NO.
^““2
• h.D.

C.D. 1
Moneys derived from the repayment of loans funded by the
mixed-income subaccount, interest thereon, and related fees and
returns shall be deposited into the subaccount.
Any moneys allocated to the mixed-income subaccount not
expended or encumbered for specific purposes within three years
after the date on which the moneys were allocated shall be
returned to the fund.
(g) There is established within the fund a bond volume cap
recycling program subaccount. The bond volume cap recycling
program subaccount shall be maintained as a reserve for the bond
volume cap recycling program established pursuant to section
39B-2(f) .
(h) The corporation shall submit an annual report to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session describing the projects funded and, with
respect to rental housing projects targeted for persons and
families with incomes at or below thirty per cent of the median
family income, its efforts to develop those rental housing
projects, a description of proposals submitted for this target
group and action taken on the proposals, and any barriers to
developing housing units for this target group.
2026-2564 SB2060 GDI SMA.docx 7

Page 8 S.B. NO.
““2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(i) For the purposes of this subpart, the applicable
median family income shall be the median family income for the
county or standard metropolitan statistical area in which the
project is located as determined by the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development, as adjusted from time to time.
(j) The corporation may provide loans under this section;
provided that the corporation shall establish loan-to-value
ratios to protect the fund from inordinate risk and that under
no circumstances shall the rules permit the loan-to-value ratio
to exceed one hundred per cent; provided further that the
underwriting guidelines include a debt-coverage ratio of [fte]
not less than 1.0 to 1.
(k) For the period commencing July 1, 2005, through
June 30, 2009, the fund may be used to provide grants for rental
units set aside for persons and families with incomes at or
below thirty per cent of the median family income in any project
financed in whole or in part by the fund in proportion of those
units to the total number of units in the project. At the
conclusion of the period described in this subsection, the
corporation shall report to the legislature on the number and
use of grants provided and whether the grants were an effective
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx 8
IWIiNIIIHIIIIIIIIHIinilll

Page 9 S.B. NO.
3%“
C.D. 1
use of the funds for purposes of developing rental housing for
families at or below thirty per cent of the median family
income.
(1) Notwithstanding the requirements of section 201H-211,
the corporation may use moneys in the fund that have been
reserved or awarded by the corporation for specific projects but
have not yet been encumbered to fund other rental housing
projects or for other authorized purposes of the fund; provided
that any use of reserved funds under this subsection shall be
subject__to_yie__followijig2.
(1) Any loan or use of funds under this subsection shall
be for a term not to exceed two years;
(2) The corporation shall ensure that the principal amount
of any loan is fully repaid or replenished before the
anticipated financial closing date of the project for
which the funds were originally reserved;
(3) The aggregate amount of loans made by the corporation
under this subsection for any fiscal year shall not
exceed $25,000,000; and
(4) The corporation shall submit a quarterly report to the
legislature detailing the amount of reserved funds
2026-2564 SB2060 GDI SMA.docx 9
iHiiiiiiiniiiiiiiniiiiiii

Page 10
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
currently deployed for other purposes under this
subsection and the schedule for the return of the
reserved funds to the fund.
(m) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to ensure the
tiroely availability of funds for projects with reserved awards,
the corporation may, with the approval of the legislature,
secure a line of credit or other instrument of indebtedness of
not more than $25,000,000 to be used to meet the requirements of
subsection (1); provided that the term of the authorized line of
credit or other instrument of indebtedness shall correspond to
each fiscal biennium budget period; provided further that the
use of a line of credit or other instrument of indebtedness
shall be strictly limited to managing timing differences between
the deployment of reserved funds under subsection (1) and the
fundin2 obM^at ions of raseryed 2roject£^"
SECTION 3. Section 201H-204, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) Activities eligible for assistance from the fund
shall include but not be limited to:
(1) New construction, rehabilitation, or preservation of
low-income rental housing units or mixed-income
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx 1
iiiiiiiiiniiiiBnHiiiiiiiiiM

Page 11
S.B. NO. ■
C.D. 1
housin2£rojec^ that meet the criteria for
eligibility described in subsection (c) or section
201H-202(f);
(2) The leveraging of moneys with the use of fund assets;
(3) Pre-development activity grants or loans to nonprofit
organizations; and
(4) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of
preservation as low-income or very low-income housing.
(b) Preference shall be given to projects producing units
in at least one of the following categories:
(1) Multifamily units;
(2) Attached single-family units;
(3) Apartments;
(4) Townhouses;
(5) Housing units above commercial or industrial space;
(6) Single room occupancy units;
(7) Accessory apartment units;
(8) Employee housing;
(9) United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development mixed finance development of public
housing units; and
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx
iiHiiiniiiiiiiniiiMi

Page 12 S.B. NO. 2060
S.D.2
H.D. 1
CD. 1
(10) Other types of units meeting the criteria for
eligibility set forth in subsection (c)[t] or section
201H-202(f)."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that sections 2 and 3 of this Act shall be repealed on
June 30, 2030, and sections 201H-202 and 201H-204, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which they
read on the day before the effective date of Act 159, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2025.
2026-2564 SB2060 CDl SMA.docx
lllliillBiliMIMIBMIMII

S.B. NO. --
H.D. 1
C.D, 1
APPROVED this Sth day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2060, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
128-26

SB No. 2060, SD 2, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives